Louisiana, session 2026, SB182.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the
portion of United States Highway 425, beginning at the northern city limit of
Winnsboro and ending at the southern city limit of Winnsboro in Franklin Parish,
Louisiana, is hereby designated as the "Mayor Billy Cobb Memorial Highway".
Section 2. The Department of Transportation and Development is hereby
directed to erect and maintain appropriate signs of this designation provided local or
private monies are received by the department equal to the department's actual costs
for material, fabrication, mounting posts, and installation of each sign, not to exceed
the sum of two thousand two hundred fifty dollars per sign.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.